Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 31. Mississippi Telecommunications Conference and Training Center

§ 31-31-1.
Short title.

This chapter may cited as the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Commission.

“Facility” means the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center located in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

“Hotel” or “motel” means and includes a place of lodging that at any one time will accommodate transient guests on a daily or weekly basis and that is known to the trade as such. Such terms shall not include a place of lodging with ten (10) or less rental units.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 542, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 2008).

§ 31-31-5.
Creation of Mississippi Telecommunications Conference and Training Center Commission; composition; appointment, terms and compensation of members; officers; quorum; director; abolition; transfer of records, personal property, funds and other assets.

There is hereby created a commission to be known as the “Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Commission” which shall consist of eleven (11) members as follows:

The Executive Director of the Department of Economic and Community Development;

The Mayor of the City of Jackson;

The President of Jackson State University;

The Vice-Chancellor for Health Affairs of the University of Mississippi Medical Center;

The Executive Director of the Metro Jackson Convention and Visitors Bureau;

The Executive Director of the Institute for Technology Development;

Three (3) members of the private sector appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, to serve a term concurrent with that of the Governor; and

Two (2) members of the private sector appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, to serve a term concurrent with that of the Lieutenant Governor.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation except that members shall be paid their actual and necessary expenses in connection with the performance of their duties as members of the commission including mileage, as authorized in Section 25-3-41 and each member who is not a state employee or a public official shall be paid a per diem as authorized in Section 25-3-69. Expenses, mileage and per diem allowance shall be paid out of the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Fund.

The commission shall elect from its membership a chairman, who shall preside over meetings, and a vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of the chairman. Four (4) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any and all business of the commission.

The commission shall appoint a director who shall be responsible for conducting the day-to-day business of the commission.

From and after the date agreed upon by the Department of Finance and Administration and the Capital City Convention Center Commission:

The Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Commission shall be abolished;

All records, personal property, funds and other assets and personnel of the commission shall be transferred to the Capital City Convention Center Commission, created by Chapter 1019, Local and Private Laws of 2004; however, the provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to any monies deposited in the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Facility Reserve Fund pursuant to Section 31-31-11; and

Any personal service, management or other contracts of like nature entered into by the commission shall be canceled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 542, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 2008).

§ 31-31-7.
General powers and duties of commission [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The commission shall have the following powers:

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To maintain offices at such places as it may designate;

To establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate and regulate the facility and other property incidental thereto, including any additional property or facilities considered by the commission to promote the business, usage or economic viability of the facility;

To grant to others the privilege to operate for profit concessions, leases and franchises, including but not limited to, the furnishing of food and banquet services, management services, and other services necessary to the operation of the facility and such concessions, leases and franchises shall be exclusive or limited;

To determine fees, rates and charges for the use of its facilities;

To apply for and accept gifts, or grants of money or gifts, grants or loans of other property or other financial assistance from any source;

To borrow funds needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that such debt may be secured only by the revenues generated by the facility, funds generated by the tax levied pursuant to Section 31-31-11 and the proceeds of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter;

To appoint, employ or engage such officers, employees, architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, financial advisors, investment bankers and other advisors, consultants, and agents as may be necessary or appropriate;

To make, assume and enter into all contracts, leases and arrangements necessary or incidental to the exercise for its powers, including contracts for management, operation or marketing of all or any part of its facilities;

To adopt, amend and repeal rules and regulations for the use, maintenance and operation of its facilities and governing the conduct of persons and organizations using its facilities and to enforce such rules and regulations; and

To do all things necessary or convenient to the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-9.
Mississippi Telecommunications Conference and Training Center Fund [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

All monies and revenues collected by the commission from fees, rates and charges for the use of its facilities shall be paid by the commission to the State Treasurer, to be deposited to the credit of a special fund to be known as the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Fund. Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the General Fund and interest earned on any amounts deposited into the fund shall be credited to the special fund. Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-31-11, all expenses incident to the operation and upkeep of the facility shall be paid out of the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-11.
Levy, assessment, and collection of occupancy tax in City of Jackson; disposition of proceeds of tax; Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Facility Reserve Fund.

For the purpose of providing funds for the payment of a certain portion of the debt service on any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and for the purpose of providing funds for the maintenance of the facility and renovations, improvements and additions to the facility, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected from every person engaging in or doing business in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, as specified herein, a tax which may be cited as an “occupancy tax,” which shall be in addition to all other taxes now imposed. Such tax shall be upon each hotel and motel located within the City of Jackson in the amount of Seventy-five Cents (75¢) per day for each occupied room.

Persons liable for the tax imposed herein shall add the amount of tax to the price of rooms, and in addition thereto shall collect, insofar as practicable, the amount of the tax due by him from the person receiving the services or goods at the time of payment therefor.

Such tax shall be collected by and paid to the State Tax Commission on a form prescribed by the State Tax Commission, in the same manner that state sales taxes are collected and paid; and the full enforcement provisions and all other provisions of Chapter 65, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply as necessary to the implementation and administration of this chapter.

The proceeds of such tax shall be deposited by the State Tax Commission into the reserve fund created pursuant to subsection (5) of this section on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which collected by the State Tax Commission.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be called the “Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Facility Reserve Fund.” Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the general fund and interest earned on any amount deposited into the fund shall be credited to the special fund. Money in the fund shall be used to pay a portion of the debt service of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter as specified in subsection (6) of this section and to provide funds for the maintenance and operation of the facility, including, but not limited to, the director and all other personnel for operational purposes. Provided, however, that not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) shall be available from the special fund to defray the costs of operation of the facility from and after April 19, 2005 through June 30, 2005.

The amount of the debt service that shall be paid annually from the reserve fund shall be the amount of the debt service on bonds attributable to forty percent (40%) of the cost of constructing the facility and the amount of the debt service on bonds attributable to all land acquisition costs. Amounts remaining in the fund in any fiscal year after the payments required by this subsection for debt service, may be used by the commission to provide funds for the maintenance of the facility and renovations, improvements and additions to the facility.

Before the taxes authorized by this chapter shall be imposed, the municipal governing authorities of the City of Jackson shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the tax, setting forth the amount of such tax and establishing the date on which this tax initially shall be levied and collected. This date shall be not less than the first day of the second month from the date of adoption of the resolution.

The resolution shall be published in a local newspaper at least twice during the period from the adoption of the resolution to the effective date of the taxation prescribed in this section, with the last publication being made no later than ten (10) days prior to the effective date of such taxation.

The tax imposed pursuant to this section shall remain in force and effect until the City of Jackson shall by resolution rescind the tax; provided, however, that the tax imposed pursuant to this section shall not be rescinded if any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter remain outstanding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2005).

§ 31-31-13.
Set aside of portion of contracts and expenditures for socially and economically disadvantaged individuals [For contingent repeal of this section, see Editor’s note].

The commission, for the purpose of promoting fairness and equity in the awarding of state business and contracts under the provisions of this chapter, may set aside for socially and economically disadvantaged individuals not more than twenty percent (20%) of its contracts and anticipated expenditures for the planning and construction of the facility. The term “socially and economically disadvantaged individuals” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS, Section 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; except that women shall be presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged individuals for the purposes of this section. Neither the Department of Finance and Administration or any other agency or department of the state shall adopt or enforce any policy, practice or procedure that conflicts with or that would have the effect of superseding the provisions of this section.

If the twenty percent (20%) set aside for socially and economically disadvantaged individuals as provided in subsection (7) of this section is not met, the commission shall state in its minutes the reasons why the set-aside percentage was not met. No liability shall accrue to the state, any agency of the state, the commission, any member of the board or any officer or employee of the state or the board as a result of the twenty percent (20%) set aside for socially and economically disadvantaged individuals not being achieved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-15.
Authorization of issuance of general obligation bonds for construction, equipping and furnishing of telecommunication conference and training facility; advertisement and sale of bonds; limitation on indebtedness.

Upon receipt of (a) a resolution from the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Facility Commission stating that the commission is ready to proceed with the planning and construction of a telecommunication conference and training facility to be located in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, (b) a resolution from the City of Jackson stating that the tax authorized pursuant to Section 31-31-11 has been levied, and (c) a determination by the Department of Economic and Community Development that a business plan for the operation of the facility that has been submitted to such department by the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Center Commission is feasible, the Department of Finance and Administration, at one time or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for construction, equipping and furnishing a telecommunication conference and training facility and for the purchase of land in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, on which to construct such facility.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such resolution, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.

The amount of bonds issued under this chapter shall not exceed Seventeen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($17,500,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-17.
Form, denominations, maturities, terms, etc., of bonds; payment of principal of and interest on bonds.

The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this chapter shall be payable in the manner provided in this section. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty (20) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-19.
Execution of bonds and coupons.

The bonds authorized under this chapter shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. However, notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-21.
Negotiability of bonds and interest coupons; compliance with Uniform Commercial Code.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this chapter have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-23.
Issuance and sale of bonds by State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this chapter, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of the bonds. The State Bond Commission may pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this chapter from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds. The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale may be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to the date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; however, the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any such bond shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this chapter, may provide that the bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-25.
Pledge of full faith and credit of state for payment of bonds.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-27.
Issuance of warrants for payment of bonds.

The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the State Fiscal Officer the necessity for warrants, and the State Fiscal Officer is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accredited value of, all bonds issued under this chapter; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest on the bonds, on their due dates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-29.
Telecommunication Conference Center Fund.

Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall deposit the proceeds of any such sale or sales in a special fund created in the State Treasury to be known as the “Telecommunication Conference Center Fund.” The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the purposes provided in this chapter, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. The costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds shall be disbursed by warrant upon requisition of the State Bond Commission, signed by the chairman of the commission. The remaining monies in the Telecommunication Conference Center Fund shall be expended by the Mississippi Telecommunication Conference and Training Facility Commission under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-31.
Necessity for additional proceedings for issuance of bonds; adoption and effective date of resolution providing for issuance of bonds.

The bonds authorized under this chapter may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things that are specified or required by this chapter. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under this chapter shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-33.
Validation of bonds.

The bonds authorized under the authority of this chapter may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by this chapter, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-35.
Enforcement of rights by holders of bonds.

Any holder of bonds issued under this chapter or of any of the interest coupons pertaining to the bonds may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce all rights granted under this chapter, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-37.
Investment in bonds by trustees, savings banks, trust companies, etc.; bonds as legal securities for deposit of public funds.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities that may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-39.
Exemption from taxation of bonds and income from bonds.

Bonds issued under this chapter and income from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 31-31-41.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers granted, but this chapter shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 628, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1995 (became law without the Governor’s signature).